trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="þ/urfa__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arf</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arft</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arf</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfum</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfið</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfa</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfti</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urftir</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfti</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urftum</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urftuð</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urftu</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfi</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfir</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfi</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfum</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfið</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfi</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrfti</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrftir</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrfti</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrftum</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrftuð</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrftu</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urf</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfum</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urfið</l>
          <r>urfa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/emja__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emur</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emur</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjum</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjið</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emja</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amdi</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amdir</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amdi</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ömdum</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ömduð</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ömdu</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emji</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjir</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emji</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjum</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjið</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emji</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emdi</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emdir</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emdi</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emdum</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emduð</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emdu</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pss"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjum</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjið</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amið</l>
          <r>emja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="þurfa"><i>þ</i><par n="þ/urfa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lemja"><i>l</i><par n="l/emja__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="semja"><i>s</i><par n="l/emja__vblex"/></e>
